Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3901
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-3901 to 77-3908 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 214;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 74;

Laws 2004, LB 811, § 1.